 He added, we now have four-month-old diabetic mice, but they used to have the disease.
 Dr . Ehud Urbach, professor of medicine at Dalhousie University in Halifax, Nova Scotia, Canada, and professor of clinical and scientific affairs at the Canadian diabetes Association,
 And, like other experts, he's skeptical about whether diabetes can be cured.
 On Monday, the Swedish Academy's permanent Secretary, Sara Danius, announced on a Swedish radio show that the Academy had not been able to directly contact Bob Dylan, and had therefore given up trying to contact him.
 Daniellus said, I've given him the best cooperator I have, and he's sent me a very friendly reply.
 Earlier, Ring CEO Jamie Siminoff had said that when the company was first starting out, he couldn't hear the doorbell ring in his garage.
 He said he had made a WiFi doorbell.
 In 2013, when he appeared on the show, the company's sales soared, and the show's producers refused to invest in the company.
 In late 2017, Seminoff appeared on the QVC television sales channel.
 Ring also settled a lawsuit with competitor ADT Security.
 Although there is a vaccine that looks like it can lower the death rate from Ebola, so far, no drug has been clearly proven to work for the current outbreak.
 A vaccine called ZMapp, a so-called antibody cocktail, initially looked promising in the field, but formal research has shown that it is somewhat less effective in preventing deaths.
 In the PALM trial, ZMapp was used as a reference, or a baseline, so that scientists could compare it to the other three treatments.
 The U S . gymnastics Association wrote a letter to the U S . Olympic Committee expressing support and accepting the strict requirements of the Olympic family, namely, to create a safe training environment for all athletes.
 We agree with the U S . Olympic Committee's statement that it is better to continue meaningful change within our organization than to withdraw our licenses.
 According to a survey supported by USA Gymnastics, we may be able to learn why survivors, brave enough to come forward, were not discovered for so long.
 The U S . gymnastics and U S . Olympic committees have a common goal, which is to make gymnastics and other sports as safe as possible,
 In the sixty s, Bzrezinski first served as an advisor to John F . Kennedy, and later for the Lyndon B . Johnson administration.
 In 1976, he provided advice on foreign policy to Carter, and later served as National Security Advisor from 1977 to 1981.
 As national security advisor, he assisted Carter in handling a number of international affairs, such as the signing of the Détente agreement in the late 1970s, the normalization of U.S. relations with China in the late 1970s, the Iranian Revolution that led to the Iran hostage crisis in 1979, and the Soviet invasion of Afghanistan in 1979.
 This film, starring Ryan Gosling and Emma Stone, was nominated for a variety of awards.
 Gosling and Stone were nominated for best male and female lead, respectively.
 Other nominations included best picture, best director, best cinematography, best costume design, best film editing, best original score, best art direction, best sound editing, best sound mixing and best original screenplay.
 Two songs from the film, "Chasing a Dreamer's Heart" and "Starlight City", were nominated for best original song.
 Late Sunday, U S . President Donald Trump, through his spokesperson, announced that U S . troops would withdraw from Syria.
 Trump issued a statement after his call with Turkish President Recep Tayyip Erdoğan.
 But regardless of his discovery, Eskimo tribes were already living there at the time.
 This not only confirmed the theory that at least some dinosaurs had feathers,
 Scientists say the top of the feathers was a chestnut color, while the bottom was a light or aubergine color.
 This discovery also helped to deepen our understanding of bird feathers' evolution.
 The dinosaurs' feathers didn't develop a main stem, called a rachis, but still had other features, like feather branches and feather tips, and researchers have speculated that the rachis evolved later than these other features.
 The structure of the feathers indicate that they were not used for flight, but rather to regulate temperature or to show off. Researchers believe that, although this is a young dinosaur, the sample shows a mature plumage, not a juvenile one.
 Researchers believe that, although this is a young dinosaur's tail, the sample shows adult feathers, not juvenile lizard down.
 Yesterday morning, a car bomb exploded at the Gaziantep police headquarters, killing two police officers and wounding more than twenty.
 The state governor's office said nineteen of the injured were police officers.
 Two hours later, three more bombs exploded near government buildings.
 They found that the sun and other stars work in the same way: the activity of all the stars in a system is completely determined by their luminosity and their rotation.
 The Rossby number of a star is determined by its luminosity and its rotation rate, and is related to the Corona.
 The smaller the Rossby number, the less active the star is in reversing its magnetic field.
 On the trip, Ishizaki encountered trouble in many places.
 He had been robbed by pirates, attacked by mad dogs in Tibet, and had been arrested in Nepal.
 The 802.11n standard can run at both 2.4 GHz and 5 GHz frequencies.
 It can backward-compatible with 802.11a, 802.11b and 802.11g, provided the base station has dual radio.
 802.11n is much faster than previous technologies, with a maximum theoretic throughput of 600 Mbit/s.
 Duval, who was married and had two grown children, did not leave much of an impression on Miller, the story's narrator.
 When asked to give his view, Miller said, “Mike said a lot of things at the hearing . I was preparing, so I didn't hear what he was saying.
 By 2020, we will strive to make our unit GDP carbon dioxide emissions fall significantly from 2005.
 He did not set a reduction target, only saying that he would decide the amount based on China's economic output.
 Hu Jintao encouraged developing countries to not retrace the old path of pollution first, then cleanup.
 He added, however, that they should not be required to bear obligations beyond their development stage, their responsibilities and their capacity.
 The Iraq study group submitted its report at 12 p m.
 The report warned that no one can guarantee that any action currently being taken in Iraq will stop the sectarian war, growing violence or slide into chaos.
 The report opened with a call for open debate and consensus on U S . policy in the Middle East.
 The report offered a scathing critique of the administration's current policy on Iraq and urged an immediate change in direction.
 In the report's 78 recommendations, the first was to take new diplomatic action by the end of this year to protect Iraq's borders from hostile forces and to rebuild diplomatic relations with neighboring countries.
 The current senator, Cristina Fernandez de Kirchner, announced her candidacy last night in La Plata, fifty miles from Buenos Aires.
 In 2005, she announced her intention to run for President in the Argentine theatre, where she began her campaign as a representative of Buenos Aires.
 This debate began over the question of spending for hurricane Katrina relief and reconstruction, which some fiscal conservatives humorously dubbed Bush's new Orleans policy.
 Critics of the rebuilding focused mainly on the awarding of rebuilding contracts to what were viewed as insiders.
 Over four hundred thousand people attended the funeral in Rome.
 For the funeral at St . Peter's, the crowd was too great, and it was impossible for every one to enter.
 In Rome, several large television screens were installed for people to watch the ceremony.
 In many other cities in Italy and elsewhere in the world, especially in Poland, similar facilities were set up to allow large numbers of people to watch.
 Historians criticize the FBI's past policy of focusing resources on easy-to-solve cases, such as car thefts, in order to boost the agency's success rate.
 Congress began funding the Scan-A-Law initiative in fiscal year 2005, and required the Federal Bureau of Investigation to assign 10 agents to combat adult sex.
 Robin Uthappa took the highest score of the innings, scoring 70 runs off just 41 balls,
 Center hitters Satchel Paige and Rahul Dravid performed well, and the pairing achieved a 100 run.
 But in the team leader's loss of three pillars, India scored only 36 points, losing seven pillars.
 President George W . Bush arrived in Singapore on the morning of November 16, beginning a week-long tour of Asia.
 He was welcomed by Singapore's Deputy Prime Minister, Huang Hengcheng, and met with Singapore's Prime Minister, Lee Hsien Loong, to discuss trade and terrorism.
 After a week of midterm election losses, Bush told the audience about the state of Asia trade expansion.
 On Tuesday, Prime Minister Stephen Harper, in his office, met for 25 minutes with New Democratic Party leader Jack Layton, and agreed to send the government's clean air act to a committee of all parties for review, and then to a second reading.
 Layton, during a meeting with the Prime Minister, demanded that the Conservative Party's environment bill be rewritten, and that it be a complete rewrite of the Conservative Party's environment bill.
 Since the Federal Government intervened to take over the funding of Mersey Hospital in Devonport, Tasmania, state and some Federal politicians have criticised the move as a November election stunt.
 But Australian Prime Minister John Howard said the bill was only to prevent hospitals being downgraded by the Tasmanian government.
 Mosasaurus was the apex predator of its time, so it feared nothing, except other mosasaurs.
 Tonga had no major losses or reports of casualties, but power was temporarily disrupted, reportedly leaving the Tonga authorities unable to receive a tsunami warning from the Pacific Tsunami Warning Centre.
 Although the warning was lifted, fourteen schools on or near the Hawaiian coastline were closed throughout the week.
 President George W . Bush supported the announcement.
 Gordon Johndroe, a spokesman for the Bush administration, called the Korean commitment a step forward in the direction of verifiable denuclearization of the Korean peninsula.
 Today, Jerry formed in the Atlantic, making it the tenth named storm of the Atlantic hurricane season.
 The National Hurricane Center said, at this point, there is no threat to land.
 The U S . Army Corps of engineers estimated that six inches of rain could overwhelm the damaged levees.
 During Hurricane Katrina, the ninth ward flooded to a depth of twenty feet,
 In one hundred foot wide stretch of the river, the water was about to spill over the levee.
 Shared resources manager Adam Cuerden expressed his displeasure with the removal of the content in an interview with Wikinews last month.
 To put it bluntly, he lied to us from the beginning.
 Because of the outrage, a draft policy is currently being drafted to address the sex content on the site, which has hundreds of millions of media that are licensed for public broadcast.
 The work completed was largely theoretical, but the programming was done to simulate observations of the Pleiades.
 The team is looking for an effect that could be caused by the tides between the dark matter in the galaxies and the dark matter in the Milky Way.
 Just as the moon pulls on the tides, the Milky Way pulls on the Andromeda Galaxy.
 Scientists can conclude that dark matter interacts with other dark matter in the same way as ordinary matter.
 The theory holds that most of the dark matter around a galaxy is in a halo of small particles.
 Television reports showed white smoke pouring out of the factory.
 The local government warned residents near the nuclear power plant to stay indoors, turn off their air conditioning, and not to drink tap water.
 The Japanese atomic energy Commission said that radioactive substances, cesium and iodine, had been detected at the nuclear power plant.
 The officials estimated that the container holding the uranium fuel was probably cracked and leaking.
 Dr Tony Morrell discovered this widespread drug-resistant tuberculosis in KwaZulu-Natal province, South Africa.
 He said in an interview, this new variant is very unsettling and worrisome because of its high fatality rate.
 Dr . Moll said some patients may have been infected in the hospital, and at least two patients were hospital staff.
 One infected person could infect 10 to 15 close contacts in a year.
 However, widespread drug-resistant TB seems to still be very low in the overall TB patient population in South Africa, at any given time, only 6,000 out of 33 million people are infected.
 These two satellites, both over 1,000 pounds, were traveling at 17,500 miles per hour when they collided at an altitude of 491 miles.
 Scientists say the blast was huge.
 They're still working to determine the size of the impact and its effects on the earth.
 The U S . Strategic Command is tracking the debris.
 The results of the graphic analysis will be published on the public network.
 Authorities in Ohio say a doctor who worked at a children's hospital in Pittsburgh, Pennsylvania, is facing a charge of aggravated murder.
 Twenty nine year old Malar Balasubramanian was found in a suburb about fifteen miles north of Cincinnati, Ohio,
 She directed the officers to check on her black ozmoebel, a car that stopped about 500 feet away.
 There, they found the body of 53-year-old Sajroj Barasubramani, wrapped in a blood-stained blanket.
 Police say the body had been there for a day or so.
 In late July, the first cases of the season were reported.
 Pigs carry the disease and then transmit it to humans via mosquitoes.
 This outbreak has prompted the Indian government to take some measures, like placing traps in heavily infected areas, distributing thousands of mosquito nets and spraying pesticides.
 The government also promised to provide hundreds of millions of polio vaccines, which will help health care providers prepare for next year.
 Lack of funding and a lower priority than other diseases has delayed plans to provide vaccines to the areas with the highest number of cases this year.
 In 1956, Słania moved to Sweden, where three years later he began working at the Swedish post office as the chief stamp designer.
 He has created over 1,000 stamps for Sweden and other 28 countries.
 His work is extremely recognizable, with high quality and rich detail, which also makes him one of the very few in the hobby who is a household name.
 He created the 1000th stamp in 2000, which was based on David Kluxen's painting of the Swedish King's great deeds, and was therefore included in the Guinness World Records.
 He has also participated in the design of many national currencies, including the new Canadian 5 and 100 dollar bills.
 After the accident, Gibbs was sent to the hospital, but he died very soon after.
 This 64-year-old truck driver was uninjured in the crash.
 At around 12:00 GMT, the vehicle was towed away from the scene of the accident.
 One worker standing in a nearby car park said, the children were waiting to cross the road and were all crying and screaming.
 They all ran back to the scene of the accident.
 Other items on the Bali agenda include saving the world's forests and sharing technology to help developing nations grow in a less polluting way.
 The United Nations also hopes to eventually set up a fund to help countries deal with the impact of global warming.
 These funds could be used to build flood-resistant housing, improve water management and promote crop diversification.
 Florence Nightingale wrote that some people tried to suppress women's voices on the issue of women's health, but that the sky would not grant their wishes.
 She came to this conclusion because many men and women personally sent her positive evaluations and encouragement, urging her to view the pill as a medical necessity.
 The wounded were sent to the hospital, the fight ended, and about 40 prisoners were left in the yard, refusing to go back to their cells.
 Negotiators tried to turn the situation around, but the prisoner's demands were unclear.
 In the summer, around ten to eleven PM, the inmates in the yard started a fire.
 Soon, police equipped with riot gear entered the courtyard and used pepper spray to drive the inmates out.
 Firefighters eventually put out the blaze at 11:35 p m.
 Looking decidedly rusty in the game against their southern sisters, South Africa however steadily improved as the tournament progressed.
 This sediment is a necessary condition for the formation of sandbars and beaches, which are the habitat of wildlife.
 Two species became extinct, and two others were on the brink of extinction, including the Bowfin.
 Although the water level only rose a few feet after the flood, officials hoped it would be enough to restore the sand barred areas downstream.
 There are no tsunami warnings yet. According to the Jakarta Geological Agency, because this earthquake did not reach a magnitude of 6.5, there will be no tsunami warning.
 Despite the fact that there was no tsunami threat, local residents felt uneasy and rushed to close their businesses and leave their homes.
 Although Winfrey wept as she said goodbye, she made it clear to her fans that she would be back.
 This is not goodbye. This is the end of a chapter, and the beginning of a new one.
 The final outcome of the Namibian presidential and parliamentary elections indicated that incumbent President Hifikepunye Pohamba was re-elected by a huge margin.
 The ruling party, the South West African People's Organisation, SWAPO, also maintained its majority in the National Assembly.
 The Spanish and Afghan forces entered the region to protect the outpost, and other coalition aircraft were also sent to support.
 The crash happened in a high-altitude mountainous region, and was allegedly caused by enemy fire.
 The search for the crash site encountered bad weather and rough terrain.
 The medical charity Mangola, Doctors Without Borders and the World Health Organisation have said this is the worst outbreak the country has ever seen.
 The Angola country director of MSF, Richard Veerman, said,
 The game started at 10 a.m. The weather was fine, with a shower in the morning, which soon cleared.
 The tournament's number one seed, South Africa, opened with a 26-00 win over number five seed Zambia.
 In the game against the Southern sister team, South Africa looked a bit sloppy, but as the game went on, South Africa's performance steadily improved.
 They are known for their strict defense, control of the ball and excellent teamwork.
 The city government and officials at the Anne Frank Museum said the tree was infected with a fungus and posed a threat to public health because it was said to be at risk of falling at any time.
 According to the original plan, it was to be cut down on Tuesday, but it was spared after an emergency ruling.
 All of the cave entrances, called the seven sisters, are at least 100 to 250 meters wide.
 Infrared images show that day and night temperatures vary, suggesting that these are caves.
 Please treat the site with all of the dignity, solemnity and respect it deserves. Do not make jokes about the Holocaust or Nazis.
 They're not as stable as the large caves on earth, which tend to keep a fairly constant temperature, but they're very similar to the deep underground,
 In France, voting has traditionally been a low-tech experience: Voters go into a small booth, put a preprinted, pre-marked piece of paper into an envelope, and drop it into a box.
 Officials verify the voter's identity, then the voter seals the ballot in an envelope and signs the ballot register.
 France has a very strict election code.
 Voting boxes have had to be transparent since 1988, so voters and observers can see that there are no envelopes in the box when voting starts, and that no other person has put an envelope into the box.
 Candidates can send representatives to observe every step of the election process. In the evening, volunteers, under tightly monitored procedures, count the votes.
 Earlier than the global release of Asus Eee PC, a personal notebook, because of cost saving and functional factors, became the topic of 2007 Taipei IT news monthly.
 But in 2007, when Asus won the Taiwanese government's 2007 Taiwan Sustainable Development Award,
 According to the station's Website, the show is a, quote,
 Early on, the show aired only on the long-running Internet radio station TogiNet Radio, a site dedicated to talk radio.
 At the end of 2015, TogiNet created AstroNet Broadcasting as a Sub-Radio station.
 The show originally featured amateur voice actors, ranging from locals to East Germans.
 According to reports, a large-scale robbery continued all night on Bishkek street.
 One observer described Bishkek as being in a state of anarchy, with groups of people roaming the streets and looting shops.
 Several Bishkek residents blamed the protesters from the South for this violation of the law.
 In the Royal Bafokeng Stadium in Rustenburg, South Africa, the South African team beat the all-black team, New Zealand.
 The final outcome was a one-point win, with the score at 21 to 20, ending the all-black team's 15-game winning streak.
 The jumping hare team finished with five consecutive defeats.
 The all-black team had won the cup two weeks before, and this was their last game.
 The last game of the series will be played next week in Johannesburg, where the Springboks will play against Australia.
 Monday night at 10:08, a strong earthquake hit Western Montana.
 The U S . Geological Survey and the National earthquake information center currently have no immediate reports of earthquake damage.
 The earthquake's epicenter was located 20 kilometers northeast of Dillon, Montana, and 65 kilometers south of Butte, Montana.
 On Monday, a dead wild duck was found in a swamp near Lyon, France, and it was confirmed to have the H5N1 avian flu virus.
 Austria, Germany, Slovenia, Bulgaria, Greece and Italy, following France, are the seventh, eighth, ninth, tenth, eleventh and twelfth countries to be hit by the virus.
 The researchers observed crystals formed in cat urine by the addition of melamine and cyanuric acid.
 Cohen has sued God, saying that he is responsible for the death, destruction, and horror that can be seen everywhere on the planet.
 Cohen was a Skeptic, and he believed his suit was a frivolous one, that anyone could sue anyone.
 Camille Saint-Saens created a French opera about a man who was addicted to drugs and obsessed with Japan.
 As a result, actors on stage were smoking marijuana, and the theater itself encouraged viewers to join in.
 Former House Speaker Newt Gingrich, Texas governor Rick Perry and female Congresswoman Michelle Bachman ultimately ranked fourth, fifth and sixth respectively.
 After the results came in, Santorum praised Romney, but criticized him harshly in the name of Romney's opponent, Iowa broadcaster, Mike Huckabee.
 Perry said he would return to Texas to assess the outcome of the caucus and to decide whether he had a chance to win the nomination.
 In August, Bahmani decided to withdraw from the race.
 The photographer was sent to Ronald Reagan UCLA Medical Center, where he later died.
 Reportedly, he was only twenty years old. Bieber released a statement saying, quote, I was not there, and I did not directly experience this tragic event, but I am still very sad for the families of the victims.
 The photographer, who was parked on the other side of Sepulveda Boulevard, started shooting the traffic stop and continued to shoot after the California highway patrol stopped their work, twice, and ordered him to return to the other side.
 The driver of the car that hit the photographer may not face a criminal charge.
 Since there was limited response to this tactic, Germany expected a similar response to its unrestricted submarine warfare.
 Athletes who failed to win a medal include Anna Cherkasova of the Netherlands, who finished ninth in the women's Super-G, and Katja Saari of Finland, who finished tenth in the same event.
 Australia's Michelle Kwan took the eleventh place in the women's Super-Combined.
 Mexico's Larissa Iltis won the women's Super-Combined, and New Zealand's Adam Hol was ninth in the men's.
 Polish visually impaired skier Maciej Krezel and his guide Anna Ogarzynska won the thirteenth place in the Super-G, while Korean skier Jong Seork Park won the twenty-fourth place in the men's sitting Super-G.
 United Nations peacekeepers arrived in Haiti after the 2010 earthquake, and they were blamed for the outbreak.
 The materials showed that the United Nations camp failed to properly disinfect waste, leading to bacteria entering one of Haiti's largest rivers, the Artibonite.
 Before the Army arrived, Haiti had never had a problem with the disease.
 The Haitian Institute for Justice and Democracy cited an independent study that showed Nepalese UN peacekeepers brought the disease to Haiti.
 The United Nations expert on the disease, Danielle Lantagne, said the outbreak was likely caused by peacekeepers.
 Hamilton confirmed that the patient's condition at the Howard University hospital was stable.
 This patient had traveled to Nigeria, where several Ebola cases had been reported.
 The hospital followed infection control guidelines, including isolating the patient from other people to prevent infection.
 Before appearing on the Simpsons, Westmoreland had worked in several shows as a writer, producer, and director.
 In the 1980s, he worked on shows like Taxi, Cheers, and The Tracy Ullman Show.
 In 1989, he co-created the Simpsons with Brooks and Groening, and hired the show's first writing team.
 Although he left the show in 1993, he retained the title of executive producer and continued to receive millions of dollars in royalties each year.
 Earlier, the Chinese news agency, Xinhua, reported that a plane had been hijacked.
 The following day, the plane was reportedly threatened by a bomb and forced to return to Afghanistan, landing in Kandahar.
 Earlier reports said the plane had been turned away from Urumqi and returned to Afghanistan.
 Air crashes are common in Iran, where civilian and military planes are old and lack maintenance.
 In the international sanctions, Iran is unable to buy new planes.
 Earlier this week, a police helicopter crashed, killing three people and injuring three others.
 Last month, a plane flying to Armenia crashed, killing all 168 people on board.
 In the same month, another plane crashed at Maschhaad, killing seventeen people.
 The sky is the limit for the Ironworkers.
 This rock band was originally scheduled to tour the U S . and Canada, and was supposed to last until September 16.
 Singer Stephen Tyler fell from the stage during a performance on August 5, and the band subsequently canceled the tour.
 Both players saved their respective service games, and then Murray won the first set in a tiebreak.
 Del Potro, however, took the lead early on in the second set, but at 6-6, a tiebreaker was needed.
 At this time, Portillo accepted the shoulder treatment, but still insisted on continuing the race.
 The show began at 8:30 p m. local time.
 All over the country, famous singers sang prayers to Shri Shyam.
 Sanju Sharma opened the show that night, followed by Jai Shankar Choudhary, who also sang the Chhappan Bhog prayer song.
 Then, Lakshman Singh led the congregation in a bhajan.
 108 discs of Chhappan Bhog were offered to Baba Shyam.
 Lakkha Singh also introduced chhappan bhog bhajan,
 On Thursday, at the Tokyo Game Show, Nintendo president Tatsumi Kimishima unveiled the company's newest Nintendo Revolution game controller design.
 The Controller, similar to a television remote control, uses two sensors placed near the user's television to triangulate its position in three-dimensional space.
 It allowed players to control movement and operations in electronic games by moving the device in the air.
 Giancarlo Fisichella lost control of the car soon after the start, and retired.
 His teammate Fernando Alonso spent most of the race in the lead, but retired shortly after his pit stop, probably because of a right front wheel that was seated too tightly.
 Michael Schumacher, shortly after Alonso's retirement, also withdrew from the race, because in several races, the suspension had been damaged.
 According to the news conference's written transcript, he said, quote, she's cute, and she sings really well.
 Every time we rehearse this performance, I'm touched,
 About three minutes later, the camera showed a massive insulation foam piece detaching from the fuel tank.
 These bubbles were thought to have caused no damage to the space shuttle.
 NASA's space shuttle project manager, N. Wayne Hale Jr, said the foam was, quote,
 Five minutes after the performance began, a gale of wind, about one minute later, the rain came down, like needles, and then hail, which scared the people so much that they ran away in a panic.
 My sister and her friend disappeared, two disabled people were sitting in a wheelchair, someone jumped over to help them push the wheelchair.
 NHK also reported that the Kashiwazaki Kariwa nuclear power plant in Niigata Prefecture was running normally.
 Tepco reported that the No. 1 and No. 2 reactors at the Fukushima Daiichi nuclear power plant had been shut down,
 According to reports, about 9,400 households in the area were without water, and about 100 households were without electricity.
 Some roads were damaged, and rail service in the affected areas was disrupted, with Ishikawa Airport still closed.
 One bomb exploded outside the governor's office.
 Two hours later, three bombs exploded near government buildings.
 Some reports say the official death toll was eight, but the official report says there were as many as thirty injured.
 In the urine samples of pets that died after eating contaminated pet food, both Nitrite and Nitrogen were found.
 The University's researchers say the two compounds interact to form crystals that could cause kidney damage.
 Researchers observed that when adding three-nitrogen triazide and three-nitrogen triazide, crystals formed in the cat's urine.
 Through infrared spectroscopy, it was found that the crystals in the urine matched those found in the affected pets.
 I don't know if you're aware of it, but most of the goods imported from Central America into this country are duty free.
 The Arabs also brought Islam to the lands, and it took in a big way in the Comoros and Mayotte.
 I think this is unreasonable and unfair.
 I said to them, you treat me this way, you treat me that way,
 Governor Arnold Schwarzenegger signed a bill that prohibits the sale or rental of violent electronic games to minors.
 The law states that violent electronic games sold in California must be labeled with a stip of eighteen, and sellers who violate the law by selling to a minor are subject to a fine of one thousand dollars.
 The Attorney General, Kier Starmer, announced this morning that he was prosecuting Hoon and Pleasance.
 Hoonah has already lost its position as the state's largest commercial fishing port.
 Huna and Praus will appear in Westminster magistrates court on February 16.
 The victims were Nicholas Alden, 25, and Zachary Cuddeback, 21, who was driving the car at the time.
 Edgar Veguilla's arm and chin were injured, while Kristoffer Schneider's face needed reconstructive surgery.
 Uka's weapon failed when it was pointed at the fifth man's head. Schneider, in pain, had one eye missing, one piece of skull missing, and had to reconstruct his face with a Titanium plate.
 Schneider, in his home country of the United States, testified via Video link.
 Besides the inter-district competition, Carpanedo also participated in two individual events.
 Her first event was the obstacle course, and she finished in the first round with a score of 36 out of 116 competitors.
 Her other competition was the large turn, in which she placed tenth with a total score of 4:41.30, two minutes and sixteen seconds slower than the first-place Austrian Klara Rossler, and one minute and sixteen seconds slower than the ninth-place Hungarian Krisztina Danyi.
 Four of the women's Giant Slalom skiers failed to finish the race, and of the 117 skiers in the giant slalom, 45 failed to make the cut.
 The central police recovered the stolen laptop and cell phone.
 Deputy Inspector General D K Arya said, we have arrested five people who raped this Swiss woman and we have found her mobile phone and laptop.
 The defendants' names were Baba Kanjar, Bhutha Kanjar, Rampro Kanjar, Gaza Kanjar and Vishnu Kanjar.
 The police chief, Chandrakant Solanki, said the accused were all masked when they appeared in court.
 Although the car hit the house, there were three people inside, but no one was injured.
 However, the driver's head was severely injured.
 The accident happened on a road that was temporarily closed, and emergency responders pulled the driver from the red Audi TT.
 Initially, he was sent to James Paget hospital in Great Yarmouth to be treated.
 He was then transferred to Addenbrooke's hospital in Cambridge.
 Huhne has resigned and he will be replaced in the Cabinet by Ed Davey MP. Norman Lamb MP is expected to take the Business Minister job Davey is vacating.
 She was detained, awaiting prosecution and trial, but any witnesses' evidence could be tainted because her image had been widely broadcast.
 This is common practice in other parts of the UK, but Scotland's judicial system is different, and the court felt that publishing the pictures could cause potential harm.
 Professor Pamela Ferguson of the University of Dundee said,
 The main Department responsible, the Royal Prosecutor's office, told the reporter that it would not make any further statements until at least the charges were laid.
 The document, leaked to the media, will reportedly mention the border dispute, and Palestine hopes to base it on the borders before the 1967 Middle East war.
 The other topics discussed included the future status of Jerusalem, which is sacred to both countries, and the Jordan Valley.
 Israel demanded a ten-year military presence in the valley, while the Palestinian National Authority agreed to only five years.
 The forest rangers closely monitored the shooters who participated in the pesticide supplemental trials, because the trials were monitored and their effectiveness assessed.
 In collaboration with the National Parks and Wildlife Service and the New South Wales shooting Association, the shooting Association recruited qualified volunteers for the hunting program.
 The National Parks and Wildlife Service (NPWS) chief executive, Mick O'Flynn, said the four shooters who had been selected for the first shooting operation had all received full safety and training guidance.
 Yesterday, Maltez was sworn in to a new interim electoral council, or CEP, made up of nine members.
 This was Martelly's fifth time being selected by the CEP.
 Last month, the Presidential Commission recommended that the former CEP resign, as part of a push to move the country towards new election measures.
 The Commission was a response to the large-scale anti-government protests that began in October.
 Since 2011, the protests have sometimes escalated into violent incidents.
 According to reports, about 60 iPods were reported to have failed, overheated, and caused 6 fires, resulting in 4 minor burns.
 The Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry in Japan said it had noticed 27 incidents related to the device.
 Last week, Japan's Ministry of Economy, Trade and Industry (METI) announced that Apple had reported 34 other incidents of overheating, although the company said these incidents were not serious.
 The Economy, Trade and Industry Ministry responded that the delay was "extremely regrettable.
 The Marianas Islands were hit by a 7.19 magnitude earthquake at 7:19 am local time,
 The National Weather Service office in Guam reported no damage.
 The Pacific Tsunami Warning Center also said it had not detected any tsunami.
 A former Philippine police officer hijacked a tourist bus in the capital, Manila, and took the Hong Kong tourists hostage.
 Rolando Mendoza set up his M16 rifle and started shooting at the tourists.
 Many hostages were rescued, and at least six hostages were confirmed dead.
 Six hostages, including children and the elderly, and those Filipino photographers were released early.
 Two photographers later replaced an old woman who needed to go to the toilet, and Mendoza was killed.
 Liggins followed in his father's footsteps, and began a career as a doctor.
 He had trained as a gynaecologist and had worked at the National Women's hospital in Auckland from 1959.
 Liggins, while working at the hospital, began studying premature birth in her spare time.
 His research showed that applying hormones could accelerate the maturation of the baby's lungs.
 The government investigators found two black boxes, the flight recorders,
 Other wrestlers also mourned Luna.
 Tommie Vaughn said, quote,
 Dustin Runnels, aka Goldust, commented, “Luna and I are alike in that we both can't be pinned down . She could be more difficult to pin down . I love her, and I'll Miss her . I hope she's in a better place .”
 In the lead up to the Federal election in 2010, a survey of 1,400 people found that opposition to Australia becoming a Republic had grown by 8% since 2008.
 Watchdog Julia Gillard during the 2010 Federal election campaign stated that she believed Australia should become a Republic after the Queen's Elizabeth II's retirement.
 Thirty four percent of respondents unanimously said they wanted Queen Elizabeth II to be the last monarch of Australia.
 Voting is polarised, with 29% of respondents saying Australia should become a Republic as soon as possible, and 31% saying it should never become a Republic.
 This Olympic gold medalist was supposed to compete in the 100 and 200 meter freestyle and the Commonwealth Games three-event relay, but his health status has been questioned ever since.
 He was unable to take medication to relieve the pain, because the competition forbade athletes from taking those drugs.
 University of Central Missouri mathematician and computer science professor Curtis Cooper discovered the largest known prime number to date on January 25.
 In early February, a few people used different hardware and software to validate the discovery and announced it on Tuesday.
 Comets may be the source of water and organic matter on earth, which could form proteins and sustain life.
 Scientists hope to learn how planets, especially the earth, formed since the last time a comet hit the earth.
 Cuomo, now 53, has been governor since early this year and signed a bill last month legalizing same-sex marriage.
 He called the rumors political nonsense and stupid behavior.
 According to the leak, he will run for President in 2016.
 The Federal Aviation Administration says NextGen can make planes fly shorter routes, saving millions of gallons of fuel each year and reducing carbon emissions.
 It uses satellite technology, rather than old-fashioned ground radar, to enable air traffic controllers to pinpoint planes more accurately and to provide pilots with more accurate information.
 There are no additional transportation options, and the surface trains do not stop at Wembley, nor are there any parking or interchange facilities.
 Fearing a lack of transportation, the competition might be forced to close its doors without any team supporters.
 On Thursday, a study published in the Journal Science reported that a new bird had formed in the Galapagos Islands of Ecuador.
 Researchers from the University of Uppsala in Sweden and Princeton University in the United States reported that, because of the local Darwin's finch and the exotic hummingbird, the new species had evolved in just two generations, although people thought it would take longer.
 Gold can be shaped into various shapes . It can be rolled into tiny shapes.
 It can be wound into a fine thread, used for wrapping and binding, or beaten or ground into a paste.
 It can be made very thin, sticking to other metals, and because of this thinness, sometimes can be used to decorate books called illuminated manuscripts.
 This is called the pH value of a chemical substance . You can use red grape juice to make a pH indicator.
 The color of the chives juice will change depending on the acidity of the chemical substance.
 pH value is a measure of the number of hydrogen ions in a chemical substance.
 Hydrogen is a proton with an electron lost,
 Stir two kinds of powder to mix them, then use clean wet hand to rub them into a ball.
 You'll notice that the water on your hand will react with the outer layer, forming a sort of Shell-Like thing, which feels very interesting.
 Harappa and Mohenjo-daro, these two cities, almost every household had a Sewage Tank, which was connected to a sophisticated sewage system.
 In the Greek city of Santorini, in the city of Minoa,
 C and G are the main letters to watch out for, since their pronunciation varies based on the following vowel.
 You give a call to someone thousands of miles away, and you use satellites.
 Satellites in space receive a phone call, and almost immediately reflect it back.
 Satellites are launched into space using rockets, and scientists use telescopes in space because the earth's atmosphere causes some light and vision to bend.
 To get a satellite or telescope into space, a giant rocket of over 100 feet high is needed.
 The wheel changed the world in ways that are unimaginable.
 Without it, we would have no trains, cars, or many other transportation devices.
 They're more efficient against specific threats,
 Finally, there are many small cat species, including domestic cats, that eat a much greater variety of small prey, including insects, rodents, lizards, and birds.
 The secret of their success was the Liger concept, where each cat was responsible for a special task, preventing them from competing with other cats.
 Lions are the most social of all cats, living in groups called prides.
 A pride consists of one to three adult males, and up to thirty females and cubs.
 As sisters and daughters, females typically have close relationships with each other.
 The lion's behavior is very similar to that of wolves or dogs,
 Tigers are all-round athletes, they can climb, swim, jump, and pull five times the strength of a human body.
 Tigers, lions, panthers, and jaguars belong to the same type, the Panthera, which are the only cats that roar.
 The tiger's roar is not so deep as the lion's, but more like a curse.
 Tigers like to eat small animals, if conditions permit, they will hunt monkeys, snakes, rodents, and birds.
 Scientists believe that the jaguar puma hunts by smelling and sniffing out the scent trails of its prey on the ground.
 They have very good night vision, can see in the dark, and are very stealthy in their hunting.
 When a small group of animals, a small species,
 This new environment has different resources and different competitors, so the new species will need different features or adaptive capabilities to become a strong competitor, rather than what they previously needed.
 The original population had not changed, and it still needed to adapt to its environment.
 Over time, new species begin to adapt to the new environment, and they start to look more and more different from other species.
 After thousands, even hundreds of millions of years, the two populations look so different that they can no longer be called the same species.
 We call this process speciation, or the formation of new species, and it is a necessary outcome of evolution,
 Plants can make oxygen for humans to breathe in and absorb carbon dioxide.
 Plants use photosynthesis to get nutrients from the sunlight, and they also provide shade.
 We use plants to make houses, to make clothes, to eat.
 Zhuge Liang was the top predator of that era, except for his peers, he was afraid of nothing.
 Its long lower jaw is lined with over seventy razor-sharp teeth, and its upper jaw has one row of teeth as well.
 Its tongue is probably bifurcated, though we are not certain about this. Its food includes sea turtles, large fish, other Megalodons, and even humans.
 It would attack anything that entered the water, even a giant dinosaur like the Tyrannosaurus.
 Although most of the foods we commonly eat were strange or unusual at the time,
 Another difference is that poor people and women sit on chairs while rich people like to have a banquet, sitting on couches.
 A few centuries later, foods imported from the Americas or Asia would not appear in the diet of the ancient Romans.
 For example, they had no corn, no tomatoes, no potatoes, and no chicken.
 Babylon built a temple for each of their gods, and considered it their home.
 People would offer sacrifices to the gods, and priests would satisfy the gods' needs through rituals and festivals.
 Each temple had a courtyard open to the public, and a inner sanctum only accessible to the priests.
 Some special towers are in the form of a pyramid, known as pyramid temples, and were built as part of a temple complex.
 The top of the pyramid is a special sanctuary of God.
 In the warm climate of the Middle East, houses are not that important.
 The Hebrew family lived mostly outdoors.
 Women were in the courtyard cooking meals, the shops were open stalls, and they used stones to build houses.
 Canaan had no great forests, so wood was very expensive.
 Greenland is sparsely populated, with only about 56,000 inhabitants.
 But no matter if he had or hadn't, the Esquimaux were already living there.
 Although all belong to the Scandinavian, Denmark, Sweden, Norway and Iceland have many differences in their people, Kings, customs and history.
 If you've seen the movie National Treasure, you might think the Declaration of Independence is painted on the back.
 Although the document on the back of the Scroll said something about a treasure map,
 The Declaration of Independence is written upside down at the bottom of the document.
 Although no one can confirm who the author was, this large leather document, measuring 29¾ by 24½ inches, was allegedly rolled up and stored when it was just written.
 It's likely that this symbol was added as a tag.
 Normandy landings and the ensuing battle freed northern France, but the South remained unliberated.
 It was ruled by the Vichy French, who in 1940 had made a peace agreement with the Germans, not to resist the invader, but to cooperate with them.
 On August 15, 1940, the Allies invaded Southern France, known as the Dragoon operation.
 In just two weeks, American and Free French armies had liberated the South of France and turned their attention to Germany.
 Civilization is a single culture shared by a group of people who live together and work together.
 The word civilization comes from the Latin civilis, which means of the citizen, and civitas, which means city or city-state.
 City-State is the nation's ancestor. Civilized culture means the knowledge is passed down from generation to generation, the footprints of culture are everywhere, and culture can be fairly transmitted.
 Minority cultures often disappear without leaving any historical evidence, and are not considered to be a civilization.
 During the Revolutionary War, thirteen states initially formed a weak central government, the Congress, as its only constituent body.
 Congress had no power to tax, and because there was no national executive or judiciary, Congress relied on state governments to enforce all laws.
 It also had no power to overturn state and local tax laws.
 These provisions must be ratified by a unanimous vote of all the states, and the state's attitude toward the central government is so light that its state-level representatives often Missed.
 Italy and Germany are the second most successful teams in the world, winning the FIFA World Cup in 2006.
 Popular sports include football, basketball, volleyball, water polo, fencing, handball, cycling, ice hockey, roller hockey and Formula One racing.
 Winter sports are most popular in the northern regions, where Italians compete in international and Olympic games.
 Japan has nearly 7,000 Islands, the largest of which is Honshu.
 Japan, because of its many Islands, is often called a list of Islands from a geological perspective.
 Western knowledge of Taiwan can be traced back to the 15th century, when European sailors passed by the island and named it Ilha Formosa, meaning beautiful island.
 In 1624, the Dutch East India company built a base in the Southwest of Taiwan, and began to change the way the aboriginals produced their food, and hired Chinese workers to work in their rice and sugar cane plantations.
 In 1683, the Qing dynasty controlled the West and North Coast of Taiwan, and in 1885, the Qing dynasty proclaimed Taiwan a province.
 In 1895, after the defeat in the Sino-Japanese war,
 Machu Picchu is composed of three main buildings, the Intihuatana, the temple of the sun, and the three windows.
 In order to better understand the original appearance of the building group, the edge of the building group was rebuilt.
 By the late nineteen seventy s, three-quarters of Machu Picchu had been restored, and work continues to this day.
 For example, the world's most common static image format is the 35 mm format, which was the dominant film size at the end of the film era.
 Today, it's still produced, but more importantly, it's long and wide ratio is applied to Digital camera image sensors.
 The actual size in mm format is 36 mm wide, 24 mm high, which is actually a bit confusing.
 And so, the aspect ratio of this format,
 Many common formats, such as the APS format series, are the same or very close to this aspect ratio.
 The three-thirds rule, often abused and mocked, is a simple guide when creating dynamic images, and it keeps the image orderly.
 It states that the most effective position for the subject is at the intersection of the three parts of the line,
 In this period of European history, the already wealthy and powerful Catholic Church was closely monitored.
 Despite the fact that European nations have different languages and customs, for a thousand years, Christianity has linked them together.
 From the King to the peasant, it permeates the power of every single person.
 One of the main tenets of Christianity is that wealth should be used to alleviate suffering and poverty, and the church's money funds are set up specifically for this.
 The centralized power in the church in Rome existed for a thousand years, and this power and money concentrated in the hands of a few people began to question whether they were following this one article.
 Soon after the outbreak of hostilities, Britain began to enforce a sea blockade of Germany.
 They cut off vital military and civilian supplies, effectively, although this blockade violated international law, which had been established over the past two centuries, according to several international agreements.
 Britain laid mines in international waters to prevent any ship from entering the entire sea, even neutral ships.
 Because of the limited response to this strategy, Germany expected its unrestricted U-Boat warfare to have a similar response.
 In the 20s, most of the city's mainstream attitude was pacifist, separatist.
 Witnessing the carnage of World War I, nations all over the world were eager to avoid a repeat.
 In 1884, Tesla moved to the United States, accepting a job with the Edison company in New York City.
 He arrived in the United States with four cents, a book of poetry, and a letter of recommendation from Charles Batchelor, his former boss, to Thomas Edison.
 Different periods in China's history have different characteristics, each period or each family that ruled China was a distinctive dynasty.
 Likewise, the same was true during the dynasty changes of the Three Kingdoms period, which lasted for 60 years, between the Han and the Jin dynasties.
 In these turbulent times, various warlords fought each other for the throne.
 Three Kingdoms is one of the bloodiest periods in Chinese history, with thousands of people dying in the struggle for control of the Western Palace.
 There are also many social and political influences, such as the use of measurement units, the transition from autocracy to a Republic, nationalism, and the belief that the nation belongs to the people, not to a single ruler.
 Besides, in the revolution, official posts were open to all men, and this made it possible for the most ambitious and successful men to fly high.
 The military, too, because rank is no longer based on rank, but on merit.
 France, in an interview, said the new variant was very highly troubling and alarming because of the very high fatality rate.
 Muhammad was very interested in life outside the dunya, or worldly life.
 The cave itself, not only withstood the test of time, but preserved Muhammad's spiritual intentions in a very vivid form.
 The cave sits on the top of a mountain, completely isolated from the outside world.
 In fact, even knowing it's there, it's not easy to find it . Once you enter the cave, it's completely isolated from the world.
 Except for the clear, beautiful sky and the surrounding mountains, nothing could be seen or heard.
 The great pyramid of Giza is the only one of the seven wonders that still stands today.
 The great pyramid was built in the third century BC, and it is one of many large pyramids that were built to pay tribute to the Pharaohs.
 The Giza plateau, which includes the pyramids, several smaller pyramids, several smaller tombs, several temples, and the Sphinx,
 The great pyramid was built to commemorate Khufu, and many smaller pyramids, tombs, and temples were built to commemorate Khufu's wives and family members.
 The symbol for upper bow is like the letter V, and the symbol for lower bow is like a nail or a square missing its bottom edge.
 The Spaniards started the colonization period which lasted for three centuries.
 The upper bow generally makes a softer sound, while the lower bow makes a stronger, more definite sound.
 Please use a pencil to make your own markings, but remember that the notes printed out are meant to be musical, so they should generally be respected.
 On October 6, 1789, a group of market women from Versailles, France, chased the King, his wife, Marie Antoinette, and their two children, Marie Thérèse and Louis Charles,
 They rode back to Paris, surrounded by a crowd, shouting and threatening the King and the queen.
 The mob forced the King and Queen to open the windows of the carriage completely.
 In front of a terrified queen, a rioter waved the head of a Royal guard who had been killed at the Palace of Versailles.
 The U S . imperialists paid for the war to conquer the Philippines.
 They were forced to pay taxes to the U S . colonial government, used to support most of the expenses, and to pay interest on bonds issued in the Philippines government's name through Wall Street banks.
 Of course, the high profits gained by the U S. imperialism are the basic gains of the U S. imperialism.
 To understand the Knights Templar, you have to understand the background that led to their formation.
 The event is commonly known as the Middle Ages, a time of European history that lasted from the year 1000 to 1300.
 The smaller the Rossby number, the less active the star with respect to magnetic reversals.
 Technological determinism is a term that encompasses many different ideas in practice, including Technological Determinism, Technological Necessity, and a strict definition of human destiny being driven by the back-end logic and its expression in technology.
 Most explanations of technological determinism include two general ideas: one is that the development of technology itself, to a very large degree, transcends cultural or political influence,
 For example, someone might say that cars are bound to promote the development of roads.
 However, just to set up a national road network for only a few cars is economically not feasible, so a new production method was sought to reduce the cost of ownership.
 The high French car ownership rate also leads to higher road traffic accident rates, which in turn drives the invention of new medical technologies to repair injuries to the injured.
 Romanticism had a strong cultural determinism color. This originated from the works of Goethe, Fichte, and Schlegel.
 In the romantic background, geography shaped the individual, and over time, geographically related customs and cultures emerged, which because of their harmony with the society in which they were placed, were much more agreeable than arbitrary laws.
 Paris was known as the world's fashion capital, and Constantinople was considered the fashion capital of the Byzantine world.
 Its reputation as a center for luxury goods began around the year 400 and lasted until around the year 1100.
 Its status declined in the twelfth century, mainly because Crusaders returned with goods, such as silk and spices, which were more valuable than those provided by the Byzantine market.
 It was at this time that the title of fashion capital of the world was transferred from Constantinople to Paris.
 Gothic style reached its peak in the 10th to 14th centuries.
 Initially, the robe was influenced by Eastern Byzantine culture.
 However, because of cultural exchange, Western fashion may lag 25 to 30 years.
 As the Middle Ages came to an end, Western Europeans developed their own style. At the time, one of the biggest advances was the use of buttons to fasten clothing.
 Self-sufficiency, or subsistence, farming is the practice of growing food only to meet the needs of the farmer and their family.
 Self-sufficiency is a simple and often organic system that utilizes the local seeds preserved within that ecological zone, combined with crop rotation or other relatively simple techniques, to maximize output.
 Historically, most farmers have engaged in subsistence agriculture, and in many developing countries, this is still the case.
 Hebrew culture allowed individuals who felt themselves to be overlooked by social standards to feel a sense of belonging.
 Given the age, race, class, location, and or gender differences among members, a subculture may be unique.
 Let's make it a little bit more specific . The cultural trait that makes a culture distinctive,
 Members of a subculture often use symbolic ways to express their membership, including fashion, etiquette, and slang.
 One of the most common ways to use the case of a child who has been neglected, abused or intentionally maltreated is to use the case of a child who has not been socialized.
 These children are known as Wild-Childs, meaning Wild-Childs. Some Wild-Childs are imprisoned by their parents, in some cases, the child is abandoned because the parents refuse to accept the child has a serious mental or physical disability.
 Wild children may have experienced severe child abuse or trauma before being abandoned or running away.
 Some people are raised by animals, some people live alone in the wild.
 If a Wolf-Child were completely raised by Non-Human animals, their behavior would, within the limits of their physical condition, be very similar to that of the animal.
 Although project-based learning should make learning easier and more fun, the scaffolding approach goes one step further.
 Scaffolding is not a learning method, but a tool to help people who are just learning to use a new computer program or start a new project.
 The support staff can be Online or Offline, in other words, the teacher is a support staff in the form of a Microsoft office like a little helper.
 Virtual support is internalized in software, used to question, prompt, and explain those programs that may be difficult for students to handle on their own.
 Kids are being abused, neglected, and even being sold for sex.
 Any child should not grow up in an environment without nurture, love, and education, but that's the reality.
 We believe the foster care system is a safe haven for these children.
 Our foster care system should provide a safe home, loving caregivers, stable education and reliable health care.
 The foster care system should provide all the necessities that their original families lacked.
 The Internet combines the elements of mass communication and interpersonal communication.
 The Internet's salient feature adds an extra dimension in terms of use and satisfaction.
 For example, learning and intercourse were considered important motivations for using the Internet (James et al., 1995).
 In researching the audience's response to the Website, Eimme and McDermott (1998) also identified new motivating factors.
 The use of Video allowed for the first time a major discovery.
 Specifically, it's been said that you can tell if someone is lying by correctly reading their micro expressions.
 Oliver Sacks, in his essay, the President's Speech,
 He even suggested that this ability to understand human behavior might be a common trait among animals.
 In the twentieth century, research showed that genes come in two kinds of library,
 Mutations add new genetic variation, while selection removes variation from the pool of expressed genes.
 Because of the separation and Recombination, variation comes back and forth between the two libraries in each generation.
 On the tropical grasslands, the long-necked animals have a digestive system similar to that of humans, and the available plant resources are very difficult to meet the long-necked animals' need for amino acids.
 If this is not done, there are serious consequences, namely growth inhibition, nutritional deficiency, and ultimately death.
 The easiest plant source of protein would be leaves and legumes, but even these are hard for us to digest unless they are cooked.
 In comparison, animal foods, such as ants, termites, and eggs, not only are easy to digest, but also provide a large amount of protein, containing all the necessary amino acids.
 If our ancestors solved the protein problem in the same way as the black monkeys do today,
 Interrupted sleep is defined as a process in which a person intentionally wakes up and falls back asleep within a short time frame,
 This is easy to do, using a relatively quiet alarm clock so that you wake up without being completely awakened.
 If you find yourself resetting the alarm clock while you're asleep, you can put the alarm clock in another part of the room to force yourself out of bed.
 Other choices based on biological rhythms include drinking a large amount of liquid, especially water or tea, before bed, and forcing oneself to get up to urinate.
 All I say to people is you treat us the way we treat you.
 The less stress, the more life force is expressed.
 Everyone can reach enlightenment, and the only obstacle to achieving it is our own tension and negative emotions.
 Tibetan Buddhism, based on the teachings of the Buddha,
 In principle, Tibetan Buddhism is very simple. It includes Kundalini yoga, meditation, and the love of all beings.
 In Kundalini yoga, Kundalini energy is awakened through yoga postures, breathing exercises, Mantras, and visual imagery.
 The core activity of Tibetan meditation is Tien Yoga, which activates energy channels by purifying the chakras and awakening the Kundalini.
 Germany was the common enemy of all the countries, which prompted cooperation between the Soviet Union and the United States.
 Two years after the war ended, former allies became enemies, and the cold war began.
 This war lasted for forty years, with proxy armies fighting in many theaters, including Afghanistan and Cuba.
 By September 17, 1939, Poland's frontline had been broken, and the only hope was to retreat and reorganize the Army.
 However, these plans were almost abandoned overnight, when the Red Army invaded the Eastern part of Poland, in violation of the Riga Peace Treaty, the Soviet-Polish Non-Aggression Pact, and other bilateral and multilateral international treaties.
 So far, shipping has been the most effective way to transport large amounts of people and goods across the ocean.
 Traditionally, the Navy's job was to ensure the nation's ability to transport people and goods, while disrupting the enemy's ability to transport their people and goods.
 One of the most noteworthy modern examples is the North Atlantic warfare during World War II.
 At the same time, the German Navy, with U-Boats as its main force, tried to intercept this transport.
 If the allies had failed, Germany would probably have conquered Britain just as it had conquered other countries in Europe.
 Sheep were first tamed about 10,000 years ago in the Zagros mountains of Iran.
 Ancient civilizations and tribes began to tame them, eat and use their milk, meat, fur and skin.
 Giancarlo Fisichella lost control of his car and ended the race very soon after the start.
 Britain had built a freight train in the 16th century.
 Although the Malay railroad car was just a wooden platform, it was able to make the horses run faster and carry more loads.
 Early on, they introduced rail beds, which were used to fix the rails, but people gradually realized that if you put iron plates on the rails,
 This became a universal practice, but the iron plates made the wooden wheels of the chariot wear out more rapidly.
 Finally, the wooden wheel was replaced by the iron wheel. In 1767, the first all-iron railroad was born.
 The first known mode of transportation is walking.
 Their ancestors, the South African Apes, did not have the habit of walking upright.
 People found the double-footedness in the 4.2 to 3.9 million year old South Chinese ape fossil, although Chad Sahelanthropus may have already used bipedal walking as early as 7 million years ago.
 We can start living a more environmentally friendly life, join environmental movements, and even become environmental activists, to reduce the future disaster to a certain degree.
 In many cases, this and symptomatic therapy are very similar. But if we don't just want a temporary solution,
 It is obvious that, because of human science and technology, the world has changed greatly, and the problem has become more serious.
 The handwritten draft, signed by Speaker John Hancock and Secretary Charles Thomson, was approved on July 4 and sent to John Dunlap's printing shop a few blocks away.
 One night, he printed 150 to 200 copies, just the now-famous Dunlap broadsides.
 On July 8, John Nixon, in the courtyard of the independent,
 One of these, to George Washington, was read to his Army on July 9, in New York, and a copy of it arrived in London on August 10.
 The twenty five Dunlap broadsides that still exist are the earliest version of the document that has survived.
 Many paleontologists believe that there was a group of dinosaurs that survived and have lived on to this day, which we call birds.
 Many people think they are not dinosaurs because they have feathers and can fly.
 But birds still have a lot of places in common with dinosaurs.
 They have scales and claws, lay eggs, and walk on two legs like the Tyrannosaurus rex.
 Today, almost all computers that are in use process information based on two's complement.
 Binary numbers can only take on two values, either 0 or 1, and this is called a Binary digit, or a bit.
 Poisoning inside the body may not immediately show up, and vomiting is a common symptom, so it cannot be diagnosed immediately.
 The most powerful indication of poisoning could be a container that was opened on the scene, containing a drug or household toxic chemical.
 Check the label on the poison, get specific instructions.
 Entomologists use the word bug to formally refer to this class of insects.
 The term comes from the familiarity of humans with ticks, a kind of parasitic insect.
 Madagascar is by far the biggest, and a continent on its own when it comes to wildlife.
 In the United States, there are about 40 million cases of multiple sclerosis, or MS, a disease that has become the leading neurological disease in young middle-aged people.
 Multiple sclerosis is a disease that affects the central nervous system, which includes the brain, spinal cord and optic nerves.
 Research has found that women are twice as likely as men to develop multiple sclerosis.
 A couple may decide not to have children for their own selfish reasons or for the sake of their children.
 These couples may have set up adoption plans for their children.
 In the adoption process, the biological parents terminate their right as parents, so that another couple can raise the child.
 The main goal of science is to find out how the world works, and in fact, this method can guide most scientific research.
 Experimentation is a way of eliminating one or more possible hypotheses, although experimentation is not the only method.
 Naturalists and philosophers focused on the classical texts, especially the Latin version of the Bible.
 Aristotle's views on all scientific fields, including psychology, were accepted as one.
 With the decline of Greek knowledge, the West severed its Greek philosophical and scientific roots.
 Researchers have observed many biological rhythms and behaviors that are largely determined by the internal rhythms and their presence.
 Periodic rhythms are not just a simple response to external periodic signals.
 The biological clock is a self-sustaining oscillator that keeps time even without any external cues.
 Hershey and Chase experiment, which showed that DNA was the main marker of heredity.
 Hersh and Cahill used bacteria or viruses to insert their own DNA into bacteria.
 They did two experiments, one using radioactive phosphorous to tag the bacteria's DNA, and one using radioactive sulphur to tag the bacteria's protein.
 Mutations can have all sorts of different effects, depending on the type of mutation, the importance of the genetic material that's affected and whether the cell is a reproductive cell or not.
 Only reproductive cells mutate, and only reproductive cells mutate to lead to cancer or cell death.
 Natural scenery tourism attracts those interested in natural areas, who come to view natural scenery, including wildlife.
 Activities include hunting, fishing, photography, bird watching, park tours and studying ecosystems.
 For example, visiting, shooting and learning about the orangutan in Borneo.
 Every day, people drive cars to work, and the places they pass on the way are the places they work.
 In this dynamic traffic tapestry, everyone is connected in some way to the system and provides support for it.
 If they sent things by air freight, on some routes it may have taken days to get through unloading and customs.
 Everyone is a member of society, and everyone uses the transportation system.
 In developed countries, you rarely hear about water quality or bridge collapses of this magnitude.
 Why is the transport system causing so much complaint? Why do they break down every day? Is it because of the transport engineers? Or is there a more fundamental reason?
 Traffic flow research is the study of drivers and vehicles in two points in time and their interactions with each other.
 Unfortunately, researching car flows is very difficult because you cannot predict the driver's behavior one hundred percent.
 Luckily, the driver's behavior tended to fall within a reasonable consistency range, so traffic flow tended to have a certain reasonable consistency, which could be roughly expressed using a mathematical way.
 For better representation of traffic flow, three main characteristics are built between them: (1) flow, (2) density and (3) speed.
 These relationships help with the planning, design, and operation of roadways.
 Insects are the earliest animals to fly in the air, and their ability to fly makes them easier to escape predators and find food and mates.
 Most insects have an advantage, they can fold their wings back along their body.
 This allowed them more small surface area to hide from predators.
 Today, the only insects that cannot fold their wings backward are dragonflies and damselflies.
 Thousands of years ago, a man named Aristarchus said the sun revolved around the sun.
 Some people think he was right, but many others disagree, and they think the solar system revolves around the earth, and the sun also,
 This seems reasonable, because the earth feels no movement, does it?
 The Amazon River is the second longest and the largest river in the world.
 The Amazon River is also the widest River on earth, with some sections as wide as 6 miles.
 The Amazon River accounts for 20% of all the world's river flow.
 The Amazon River is 6,387 kilometers long.
 Despite the fact that stone pyramids were built until the end of the Old Kingdom, the size and sophistication of the Giza pyramids has never been surpassed.
 The new Kingdom period Egyptians marveled at the memorials of their predecessors, which were over a thousand years old.
 The Vatican city has a population of about eight hundred people, it is the smallest independent country in the world, and it has the smallest population of any country.
 The Vatican City uses Italian in its laws, regulations, and official communications.
 Italian is also the language most used by the country's daily workforce, while Latin is used for religious ceremonies.
 All citizens of the Vatican City are Roman Catholics.
 People have known gold, silver, copper, and other basic chemical elements since ancient times because these elements all occur naturally and are relatively easy to use with primitive tools.
 Aristotle proposed a theory that any thing was composed of one or more of the four elements, namely, earth, water, air, and fire.
 This more like the four states of matter, in sequence, not handy,
 Alloys are basically made up of two or more metals mixed together . don't forget, there are a lot of elements on the periodic table.
 Calcium, potassium, and so on, are metals, and silver and gold are metals, too.
 There are also a few buses going north to Hebron, the traditional burial place of the Biblical patriarchs Abraham, Isaac, Jacob, and their wives.
 Everything in the universe is made up of tiny particles called atoms.
 Atoms are so tiny that the period at the end of this sentence could contain millions of atoms.
 Lead pencils became a favorite of many people.
 Unfortunately, as new writing styles emerged, the pencil's position became lower and lower, and its use became less and less.
 People now write information on computer screens, forever without touching pen, ink, and paper.
 People can only guess what the outcome will be when the updated product appears.
 The fission atom bomb works as follows: to bring together a nucleus and many protons and neutrons requires energy.
 It's like pushing a stupid little cart up a hill, splitting the nucleus again, and then releasing some energy.
 Some atoms contain unstable atomic nuclei, which means that they are likely to split in very few or no stimuli.
 The surface of the moon is made up of rock and dust. The outer layer of the moon is called the crust.
 The crust is about 70 kilometers thick near the surface and about 100 kilometers thick farther away.
 The dark side down, the thin crust on the high side, the thick crust on the low side.
 Because the crust is thinner, the nearer side may have more shadows, and the lava is more likely to rise to the surface.
 The core of the Incentive content theory is to find the factors that make people feel recognized or interested.
 These theories suggest that as people mature into adulthood, certain needs and or desires are internalized.
 These theories research why some people want to do what they do, and what in their environment will cause them to do or not do certain things.
 Two popular content theories are Maslow's Hierarchy of Needs and Herzberg's dual factor theory.
 Generally, when managers start leading past colleagues, two kinds of behavior occur.
 This type of manager finds it hard to make unpopular decisions, and has difficulty in enforcing discipline, evaluating performance, distributing responsibility, and holding people accountable.
 In another extreme case, this person will change into a totally different individual, feeling that he or she must change everything the team does and take credit for the results.
 At the end of the day, leaders are ultimately responsible for the success or failure of their team.
 This behavior often leads to disagreements between leadership and other team members.
 Virtual teams need to uphold the same quality standards as traditional teams, but there are subtle differences.
 Virtual team members often serve as the point of contact for their corresponding line team.
 They tend to have more autonomy than traditional team members, because their team may schedule meetings at different times zones, and the local management may not understand this.
 The central authority of the church had been in Rome for over a thousand years and this concentration of power and money led many to question whether this tenet was being met.
 The invisible team is a management team that every member reports to.
 Why does it take so long for an organization to build a learning organization?
 When all available resources are effectively utilized among the functional departments of an organization, creativity and innovation occur.
 Therefore, an organization in the process of overcoming a barrier,
 In order to create innovation, leaders must create a culture of innovation, share knowledge, and engage in organized learning.
 Angel (2006) explains the continuous process as a way to help organizations achieve higher levels of performance.
 Neurobiology data provides physical evidence for the theoretical approach of cognitive research, so it narrows the scope and makes research more precise.
 The relationship between brain disease and behavior can support researchers.
 We know very early on that different types of brain injury, trauma, disease and tumor can affect behavior and lead to certain kinds of changes in the brain.
 The rise of new technologies has enabled us to look at and study the structure and workings of the brain, which were previously unseen.
 This provides us with a lot of information and material to build a simulation model, which helps us to understand the process of the brain's operation.
 Artificial intelligence has a very strong science fiction color, but it's actually a very important branch of computer science, which studies the behavior, learning and adaptation of machines.
 Artificial intelligence research involves making machines that can do tasks automatically.
 Examples include control, planning and scheduling, the ability to respond to customer diagnostics and customer problems, handwriting, speech and facial functionality.
 All of these became independent disciplines, focusing on providing solutions to real-life problems.
 Artificial intelligence systems are now commonly used in economics, medicine, engineering and the military, and some household computers and electronic games software applications have built-in artificial intelligence systems.
 Field trips are an important component of any teaching activity. Usually, teachers are very willing to take students to places that are not accessible by public transportation.
 Virtual field trips are high-tech solutions. Students can watch museum artifacts in the classroom, visit a water park, or view a beautiful piece of art.
 To share the field trip virtually, also is a good way to review the trip and share the experience with the later classes.
 For example, Bennet school in North Carolina, each year, students design a Website about their state capitals, and each year, the Website is redesigned, but the old versions are kept Online as a scrapbook.
 Blogging also helps students improve their writing skills . Although students often begin Blogging with grammar and spelling mistakes, the presence of readers often changes this.
 Students are often the most critical readers, so Bloggers begin to work hard to improve their writing, to avoid criticism.
 Blogging also forces students to be more observant of the world around them.
 Blogging can also encourage cooperation, and it can encourage students to extend their learning beyond the traditional classroom.
 Blogs can be used to make students more analytical and reflective by actively responding to the context of others' writings and by being able to articulate their own points of view on specific issues.
 Ottawa is the capital of Canada, a vibrant city that uses bilingualism, and features a series of art galleries and museums that showcase Canada's past and present.
 Further south is Niagara Falls, and to the north is Muskoka, a river and its untouched natural beauty.
 All of these things make Ontario the typical image of Canada that outsiders have.
 Further north, the land becomes sparsely populated, with some areas being almost uninhabited wilderness.
 One striking population data comparison is that the number of African-Americans living in the United States is greater than the number of Canadian citizens.
 The East African Islands are located off the East Coast of Africa in the Indian Ocean.
 Madagascar is the largest Island, and it's still a piece of the continent for wildlife.
 The smaller Islands, most of them independent or belonging to France, are known for their luxurious beach resorts.
 Arabs also brought Islam to the land, and this one teaching is prevalent in the Comoros and Mayotte nation.
 Europe's influence and colonialism began in the 15th century, when Portuguese explorers Vasco da Gama discovered the Cape route from Europe to India.
 The northern and western parts of the country are bordered by the Atlantic Ocean.
 Suggest that regardless of actual marital status, all female visitors should say they are married.
 Wearing a ring also helps,
 Women should be aware that cultural differences can lead to what they perceive as harassment, and that being followed, grabbed, and so on, is not uncommon.
 When a man refuses a woman, he must be firm, and not be afraid to stand by his own position.
 Modern city Casablanca was founded by Berber fishermen in the 10th century, and was used as a strategic port by the Phoenicians, Romans, and Merinids.
 The Portuguese destroyed the city and rebuilt it, naming it Casa Branca, until a 1755 earthquake left it abandoned.
 Morocco's Sultan rebuilt the city as Daru l-Badya, a Spanish merchant built a trading base here and named it as Casa Blanca.
 Casablanca is one of the most boring shopping destinations in all of Morocco.
 Selling Tajik pots, pottery, leather goods, water pipes, and various small trinkets, shops cater to tourists.
 Goma is a tourist city in the Democratic Republic of the Congo, located on the eastern edge of the Congo, near Rwanda.
 In 2002, Goma was destroyed by the Nyragongo volcano, which buried most of the town's streets, especially in the center.
 Although Goma is considered safe, it is advisable to check before travelling to any place outside Goma, in order to know whether the fighting in North Kivu has abated.
 This city is also the base for climbing Mount Nyiragongo, the most affordable mountain gorilla tracking project in Africa.
 You can take a boda-boda to Goma for the normal price of 500 Congolese francs.
 Because it's more Hierarchical and formal,
 Today, although Tingri is a tourist destination and has an airport, it is a poor town.
 In the nineteen ninety s, because of the threat of the desert, it was listed as a World Heritage site.
 This is Henry Louis Gates on the special program, the African world's miracle.
 This city forms a stark contrast to the rest of the country, as it is more Arabic in style than African.
 Kruger National Park is located in northeastern South Africa, bordering Mozambique to the east and Zimbabwe to the north.
 The park covers 19,500 square kilometers and is divided into 14 different ecological zones to support different wildlife.
 It is one of South Africa's main tourist attractions, and is considered to be the flagship of the South African National Parks system.
 Like all South African national parks, it charges an entrance fee and a conservation fee every day.
 Buying a Wild Card also has its advantages. With this card, you can enter some of the parks or all of the National Parks in South Africa.
 Hong Kong Island is the nickname of Hong Kong, and also the focus of many tourists.
 The skyline of Hong Kong is a flashing, lighted diagram,
 If you want to see Hong Kong from the best angle, you can leave the island and head to Kowloon, the opposite side of the harbor.
 Most of Hong Kong's urban development has been concentrated on the reclaimed land in the northern shore.
 This is where British colonizers occupied the land, so if you want to find evidence of this colonial history, this is a good place to start.
 Sundarbans is the world's largest mangrove forest, stretching 80 kilometers from the coast to the land of Bangladesh and India.
 Sundarbans has been declared a world heritage site by UNESCO.
 These forests, however, are not only mangrove swamps, but also contain the remnants of some of the great forests that once covered the Ganges plain.
 Sunderland covers an area of 3,850 square kilometres, of which about one third is water.
 Since 1966, it has been a wildlife preserve, home to an estimated 400 Royal Bengal Tigers and about 30,000 deer.
 There are public transit buses from the city to the JAKARTA/BUMDING station, but most of the buses, especially those to the East and to JAKARTA, leave between 06:30 and 07:30.
 Given the range of buses,
 It's expected that most event tickets will cost between ¥2,500 and ¥130,000, with typical tickets costing around ¥7,000.
 To get to nearby places like Palo and Punaka, a shared taxi is a fast, comfortable way to go.
 The Oyapock River Bridge is a suspension bridge that spans the Oyapock River, connecting São Paulo, Brazil, to Saint-Georges, French Guiana.
 Two towers are 83 meters high, the bridge is 378 meters long, and there are two 3.50 meter wide car lanes.
 The bridge is 15 meters high, and it was completed in August 2011, but it didn't start operating until March 2017.
 The bridge is expected to be fully operational in September 2017, when the Brazilian customs checkpoint is also expected to be completed.
 Guaraní people are the most important indigenous group living in the Eastern part of Paraguay, where they live a semi-nomadic lifestyle, hunting and farming.
 Chaco, the region of Guaycuru and Payagua, was home to other indigenous tribes who lived off hunting, gathering and fishing.
 The sixteenth century Paraguay was called the great province, a product of the encounter between Spanish conquerors and the indigenous groups.
 Spanish people began a three-century long period of colonization.
 Since Asunción was founded in 1537, Paraguay has worked to preserve many of the city's native characteristics and features.
 Argentina is known for having the world's top polo team and players.
 The largest tournament of the year is held in Las Cañitas in December.
 In other days of the year, smaller tournaments and competitions are held here.
 If you'd like to learn more about the championship and how to purchase tickets, please check out the Argentine Polo Association's Website.
 The Falkland Islands pound is the official currency of the Falkland Islands, and is equal in value to the British pound sterling.
 You can exchange money at the island's only bank, which is located in Stanley, opposite the FIC West store.
 Pound sterling is generally accepted throughout the island, and Stanley also often accepts credit cards and U S . dollars.
 In the outer Islands, credit cards may not be accepted, but U S . and U K . currency is accepted.
 It is almost impossible to exchange Falkland Islands currency outside the Islands, so you need to exchange it before you leave the Islands.
 Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay Montevideo, Uruguay
 Mont de Violet is located in the subtropical region, and in summer months, the temperature often exceeds 30°C.
 Winters can be colder than they appear, with temperatures rarely falling below zero, but when wind and humidity combine, it can feel colder than the thermometer reads.
 There is no specific rainy and dry season, as the rainfall is more or less the same throughout the year.
 Although many of the park's animals are accustomed to humans, wild animals are wild animals, and we should not feed or disturb them.
 The park's managers say that bears and wolves need at least 100 yards,
 After all, the leader is ultimately responsible for the success and failure of the team.
 Each year, dozens of tourists are injured because they fail to keep a proper distance.
 In the warm climate of the Middle East, the house was not so important.
 Apia is the capital of Samoa. The town is located on the island of Upolu, with a population of less than 40,000.
 Apia, the capital, was founded in the 1950s and has been the capital of Samoa since 1959.
 The Bay had seen a notorious naval confrontation in eighteen eighty nine when seven ships from Germany, the United States, and Britain refused to leave the Bay.
 Except for one British cruiser, all the other ships sank, killing nearly two hundred Americans and Germans.
 In the town of Mua, a peaceful gathering organized by the Mua movement to demand independence, a peaceful gathering led to the assassination of the chief Tupua Tamasese Lealofi III.
 Auckland straddles two harbours, so there are many beaches, the most popular of which are in three areas.
 The North Shore beaches, located on the Pacific Ocean, stretch from Long Bay in the North to Devonport in the South.
 Here it's almost all sandy, so swimming is safe, and there's plenty of New Zealand Christmas trees for shade.
 Tamaki Drive is a beachfront suburb just north of Auckland's central business district, in the middle of Waitemata Harbour.
 These beaches are sometimes crowded with holidaying families, and lined with all sorts of shops.
 The main beer is number one beer, it's not complicated, but it's very good to drink, very refreshing.
 You can buy a lot of French wine here, but New Zealand and Australian wines may be more durable for long-distance transport.
 The local tap water is completely safe to drink, but if you're still worried, you can also easily buy bottled water.
 For Australians, the concept of a flat white coffee is still a bit foreign.
 Chocolate is expensive, but the quality is very good.
 There are many people who visit the reef all year round, and there are very few injuries that occur as a result of any of these activities.
 Despite this, she is in custody pending indictment and trial, but any eyewitness evidence may be tainted because her image has been widely published.
 Box Jellyfish are required to wear skirts covering the knees and have their shoulders covered, too.
 Sharks do exist, but they rarely attack humans, and most sharks are afraid of humans and will swim away.
 The main habitat of the Freshwater crocodile is not the ocean, but the Rockhampton area north of the river.
 Early booking can give travellers peace of mind, knowing that they have a place to stay when they arrive at their destination.
 Although a tour company may help you book a tent, etc, they will usually work with a specific hotel.
 The tour operator will usually provide a package that includes breakfast, airport transfers, and sometimes even a flight and hotel stay.
 If you need time to consider the price or go to the destination and get other documents, such as a visa, they can reserve the booking for you.
 If you need to make any changes or have any requests, it should be done through the travel agent first, and not directly with the hotel.
 At some music festivals, a large majority of participants choose to camp on site, and a large majority of participants consider this to be a very important part of the music festival experience.
 If you want to get close to the action, you'll need to get there early and stake out a good spot near the stage.
 Remember, though the main stage music may have ended, the other parts of the festival can continue playing music until late at night.
 Some music festivals have set up special camping areas for families with children.
 If you're crossing the North Pole in winter, to check the position of the cabin, because it's going to be a very horrible noise for those most affected.
 St . Petersburg cruise includes city tour. Cruise passengers may obtain a visa free of charge.
 Casinos generally try to make customers spend as much time and money as possible.
 They typically provide special food, drink, and entertainment activities to keep customers happy and keep them in the casino.
 Some sites offer free alcoholic drinks, but drunkenness can weaken a person's judgment, and all good gamblers know the importance of staying sober.
 Anybody who drives or crosses a mountain pass in high latitudes should consider the possibility of encountering snow, ice or freezing temperatures.
 On ice-covered roads, the friction is very low, and you can't drive as fast as on a smooth asphalt road.
 In a blizzard, snow can fall in such a short time that it can trap you.
 Snow, sleet, rain, or frozen water droplets on the windshield can also block your vision.
 On the other hand, snowy weather is common in many countries, and transportation almost never stops throughout the year.
 Hunting is perhaps the most attractive tourist activity in Africa, and is also a highlight for many tourists.
 Safari, in common usage, refers to a land-based trip to view amazing wildlife, especially in the tropical grasslands of Africa.
 Some animals, such as elephants and long-necked rhinos, tend to like being near cars, and standard equipment can make it easier for people to better appreciate them.
 Lions, leopards and tigers are sometimes afraid of people, and you can see them more clearly with a binocular telescope.
 Hiking, also called backpacking, bushwalking, or trekking, is mainly walking, usually for several hours or days at a time.
 The Paralympics will be held from August 24 to September 5.
 Tokyo will become the only Asian city to host two Summer Olympic Games, the first being in 1964.
 If you had booked a flight and a hotel for 2020, you might face a tricky situation.
 Canceling policies vary, but as of March, most canceled policies due to the new Coronavirus have not been extended to July 2020, the originally scheduled Olympic Games.
 Ticket prices are expected to range from 2,500 yen to 130,000 yen, with the average price being around 7,000 yen.
 Ironing wet clothes can help to make them dry. Even if the room has no iron and board, many hotels offer a laundry service.
 If you don't have an iron, or if you don't like wearing ironed socks, you can use a blow dryer instead.
 Be careful not to let the clothes get too hot,
 There are many ways to clean water, some of which are more effective at certain types of pollution.
 In some areas, one minute of boiling is enough, in other areas, it takes a few minutes.
 Filtering effects vary, so if you're concerned about this, then you should consider buying a sealed bottle of water from a reputable company.
 Travelers may encounter a harmful animal that is not common in their home.
 Pests can destroy food, cause irritation, and in more severe cases, cause allergic reactions, spread toxins or spread disease.
 A contagious disease itself, or one that can transmit a dangerous virus to humans,
 Tax-free shopping is an opportunity to buy tax-free goods in a designated location.
 Travelers heading to countries with high taxes on alcohol, tobacco, and other products can sometimes save a lot of money by purchasing these products in these locations.
 The most challenging driving conditions on the Buford-Pittsburgh highway are between Point Marion and Fairmont,
 If you're not used to driving on rural roads, then you'd better keep your wits about you.
 The signage on the roadway was significantly lower than on the other sections, and the signage was often ignored.
 Oddly, though, the cell service here is stronger than on many other routes, like the Pennsylvania prairie.
 Germany's pastries are not bad, but Bavaria's pastries are even more rich and varied, similar to their neighbor Austria.
 Fruit tarts are very common, and apples can be used all year round to make tarts, and in the summer, you can eat peach and apricot tarts.
 Many German baked goods also feature apricots, almonds, and other nuts.
 If you want something a little bit more flavorful, you can try fruit jam packs, which are a sweet treat in different regions, like Berliner, Pfannkuchen, Krapfen.
 Chicken curry is a dish that is made with a blend of spices and meat or vegetables.
 Curry can be either wet or dry, depending on how much water is in it.
 In northern India and Pakistan, curry is often made with sour milk, while in southern India and other parts of the Subcontinent, it is often made with coconut milk.
 Indonesia has 17,000 Islands, so Indonesian cuisine is just a catch-all term that encompasses all the various regional cuisines.
 But if there are no more decorative words, this word often means food that originates from the central and eastern parts of the main island of Java.
 Now, the Islands have many dishes with different kinds of spices, but the main spices that the Javanese like are peanut, chili, sugar, especially Javanese palm sugar, and various spices.
 The saddle hung on either side of the saddle, used to support the rider's two feet.
 They provide better stability, but also have safety hazards, because the rider's foot can get stuck.
 If a rider is thrown from a horse, but one foot is caught in the stirrup, the horse may drag him along. To minimize this risk, some precautions can be taken.
 First, most riders wear spurred boots, and the soles are very smooth and narrow.
 Secondly, some saddles, especially English-Style saddles, have a safety catch, which if the rider falls backwards, the saddle girth will come undone.
 Chile's first choice mountain destination, Cochamó Valley, has been called South America's Yosemite, with its variety of granite walls and cliffs.
 From the mountains one can see a stunning view of the world's highest peaks.
 Skiing on a snowboard or a snow ski involves a snowboard or a snow ski that is attached to your feet and allows you to slide down a snow-covered terrain.
 Skiing is the main tourist activity for many ski enthusiasts, who are sometimes called ski bums.
 The idea of skiing goes back a long way, with cave paintings of skiers dating back to 5,000 BC.
 As a sport, high-altitude skiing can trace its origins back to at least the 17th century, when Norwegians opened the first recreational ski club in Australia.
 Skiing Freeride: This activity is also called Backcountry skiing, Ski-Touring or Ski-Trekking.
 This activity is related to Alpine skiing or mountaineering, but usually not both.
 Imagine a ski slope as a hiking trail.
 When conditions are good, you can walk farther—but only in a very few circumstances do you get the same speed as when you're not carrying a heavy backpack on a level, groomed trail.
 Europe is a continent of relatively small but many independent countries, and in the usual case, traveling across multiple countries means having to go through multiple visa applications and passport checks.
 In this regard, Schengen is a bit like a country.
 Once you are in the region, you can usually just go straight through the border without having to go through a passport checkpoint again.
 The same goes for Schengen visas, which you don't have to apply for separately to each Schengen member state, saving you time, money and hassle.
 There is no uniform definition of what constitutes an antique. Some tax agencies define an antique as anything over 100 years old.
 The definition varies by region, and in North America, for example, the year limit may be shorter than in Europe.
 Handicrafts may be defined as antiques, although they are much shorter in years than mass-produced items of the same kind.
 Reindeer herding is an important part of the Sami culture, and around this industry, culture is very important to many people who have other professions.
 However, even if we start from the traditional meaning, not all Sámi people participated in the large-scale reindeer herding business, they lived on fishing, hunting and similar activities, and they usually kept reindeer as working animals.
 Today, many Sami people are involved in the tourism industry, which is a major source of income for the Sami region.
 Although the term Gypsy is widely used, especially among non-Roma, it is generally considered to be offensive, because it is associated with negative stereotypes and misconceptions about Roma.
 If you're visiting a country that's subject to a travel warning, your travel health insurance or travel cancellation insurance may be affected.
 You can also consult with other governments, but their advice is for their citizens.
 For example, American citizens in the Middle East may face different treatment than Europeans or Arabs.
 Travel warnings can only provide a brief summary of the situation.
 While other places provide more detailed information, this one tends to be more general, vague and oversimplified.
 Adverse weather is a general term for any dangerous weather that causes damage, severe social disruption, or loss of life.
 Anywhere in the world, bad weather can happen.
 Wildfires, hurricanes, floods, tornadoes, lightning, hail,
 Regional and seasonal severe weather events include blizzards, snowstorms, ice storms and sandstorms.
 Strongly recommend that travelers pay attention to the severe weather risks in their destination, which could affect their travel plans.
 Any plan to go to a potentially war zone country should receive professional training.
 Search for the phrase, “How to deal with hostile environment training” on the Internet, and you may find the address of a local company that provides training.
 This course normally covers all the issues discussed here, and often goes into great depth using real-world experience.
 The course training normally lasts 2 to 5 days and will cover role play, first aid, and sometimes also arms training.
 There are books and magazines about outdoor survival, but there are very few publications about combat survival.
 Travelers planning to have a sex change operation abroad must bring valid documents when returning home.
 As to whether they would like to issue passports without a gender marker, or whether they would like to change the documents to fit with the name and gender they want,
 The degree to which foreign governments recognize these documents also varies.
 In the days after September 11, 2001, security checkpoints became more annoying.
 Transgender people who have not yet had surgery are forced to reveal their privates and cannot protect their dignity.
 Offshore flow is the return flow of waves from the beach to the sea, typically occurring at a dark reef or similar location.
 The underwater topography causes the return flow to concentrate in a few areas where it may form a rapid current.
 Most deaths are caused by swimming against the current,
 After getting past the security checkpoint,
 Try to swim to a place where you won't get stuck again, or wait for rescue, depending on your skills and whether you've been discovered.
 The return home shock was more intense, lasted longer, and was more severe.
 For travelers who adapt easily to new cultures, it's sometimes hard to readapt to their home culture.
 After living abroad for a while, you will find that you have adapted to the new culture and dropped some of your hometown culture habits.
 When you first come to a new country, people can be very tolerant, very understanding, because they know that travelers need to adapt to a new country.
 People may not realize that Voyager also needed patience and understanding on its return journey.
 For children, the sound and light show is one of the most fun activities in the area.
 You can see the pyramids in the dark, and before the show starts you can see them just sitting there,
 You can hear tourists and small vendors all the time.
 The backdrop screen is a lion-headed man, and it is also the narrator of the long story.
 Scenes are displayed on the pyramids, different pyramids being lit up.
 South Shetland Islands discovered in 1819. Several countries claim sovereignty over the Islands, and there are the most bases on the Islands, with sixteen bases in use in 2020.
 This is the place the British colonisers took as their own and so if you are looking for evidence of the territory's colonial past, this is a good place to start.
 Other Islands include Livinston Island and Deception Island, where a still active volcano was submerged by flood waters to provide a magnificent natural harbor.
 Ellsworth land, located in the southern part of the peninsula, faces the Bellingshausen sea.
 The mountains here re-enter the high plateau, then re-form the Ellsworth mountain range, which is divided by the Minnesota River.
 North, or the Southern Andes, which has the highest mountain range in Antarctica, the highest peak being Mount Vinson, at 4,892 metres.
 In remote areas where cell phone service is not available, satellite phones may be your only option.
 Satellite telephones generally cannot replace mobile phones, because only outdoors can a satellite signal be received.
 The service is commonly used for shipping, including yachts, and for exploration with far-reaching data and voice needs.
 Your local telephone service provider should be able to provide you with details on how to connect to this service.
 For those planning how to spend the gap year, studying abroad is becoming an increasingly popular option.
 This is especially popular among high school graduates, who can take a year off before entering college without affecting their eligibility for financial aid.
 In many cases, taking a gap year overseas can substantially improve your chances of getting into a top school back home.
 Usually, participation in these educational projects requires a fee.
 Finland is a great sailing destination, with a thousand lakes and thousands of Islands.
 In the Islands and lakes, a boat is not necessary.
 The researchers observed crystals formed in cat urine by the addition of melamine and cyanuric acid.
 Boating is a nationwide Finnish pastime, with one boat for every seven to eight people.
 Norway, Sweden and New Zealand also have similar situations, but in other ways are very unique.
 Most typical Baltic cruises will spend a long time in St . Petersburg, Russia.
 This meant that he could have a full day to visit this historic city and then return to the ship in the evening.
 If you're only going to disembark, then you don't need a separate visa.
 Some cruise lines advertise Berlin as a highlight, as seen on the map above, but Berlin is not near the sea, and cruise prices do not include sightseeing in the city.
 For people of all ages and backgrounds, flying can be a terrifying experience, especially if they've never been on a plane before or have had a bad experience.
 That didn't seem to make sense to me, it certainly wasn't fair.
 For some people, knowing how an airplane works and the flight process can help overcome fears of the unknown or uncontrollable.
 The courier company can gain high rewards for fast delivery of goods, and time is often of great importance for business documents, goods, or parts used for urgent repairs.
 On some routes, large companies have their own planes, but for other routes and small companies, it's a problem.
 If they use air transport, it can take days to unload and clear customs on some routes.
 The fastest way is to carry it as unchecked baggage, and according to the airline's regulations, it is forbidden to carry unchecked baggage, so you need to be there at the time.
 Sitting in first or business class is the most obvious way to enjoy this privilege, or, better yet, have your company pay for it.
 However, this is not cheap: According to rough estimates, a business class ticket could be as much as four times the price of an economy class ticket, and a first class ticket could be as much as eleven times the price of an economy class ticket.
 Generally speaking, from A to B, there's no need to look for business or first class discounted tickets.
 Airlines know that some core customers are willing to pay a premium for fast, comfortable travel, so they charge accordingly.
 Moldova's capital is Chisinau, and the language spoken there is Romanian, although Russian is also widely used.
 Moldova is a multiethnic Republic, and has suffered greatly from ethnic conflict.
 In 1994, this conflict led to the formation of the Transnistria Republic, which has its own government and currency, but is not recognized by any United Nations member state.
 Despite the political talks failing, the two regions' economic ties were rebuilt.
 Moldova's main religion is Eastern Orthodoxy.
 Izmir is Turkey's third largest city, with a population of about 3.7 million, and it is Turkey's second largest port, after Istanbul.
 Once the city of Smyrna, it is now a modern, developed and busy commercial center surrounded by a huge bay and mountains.
 Between the wide avenues, glass-walled buildings and modern shopping centers, scattered are traditional red-tiled roofs, 18th-century markets and ancient mosques and churches, although this city has more of a Mediterranean European feel than traditional Turkey.
 In Haldarsvik, you can enjoy the view of Eysturoy, a nearby Island.
 In the cemetery, some of the tombs are decorated with funny stone carvings of a bird.
 It's a half hour walk through this enchanting village,
 Toward the North, it is easy to reach the romantic and picturesque town of Sintra, which is known to all foreigners as the Lisbon of Byron.
 Scotturb 403 public buses run regularly to Sintra, stopping at the Rocha Cape.
 You can also visit the North to see the Sanctuary of Fatima, where the Virgin Mary appeared.
 Please remember that you are in fact visiting a huge mass grave site, one that has tremendous meaning for a large group of people.
 There are still many men and women who survived here, and they are still alive today,
 Please give this place the dignity, the solemnity and the respect it deserves, not to be used as a joke or a Nazi reference.
 Do not mark or paint on the building to avoid damaging the site.
 Barcelona is the official language of Catalonia and Spain. About half of the local people prefer to speak Catalan, and almost all can understand it.
 However, most signs only use Catalan, as this is the first official language, as stipulated by law.
 However, public transport and other facilities also use Spanish widely.
 The regular broadcasts in the Metro are only in Catalan, but the automatic system uses multiple languages, including Spanish, English, French, Arabic and Japanese.
 Parisians are known for being self-centered, rude and arrogant.
 Although this is often just a stereotype, the best way to live in Paris is to try to behave like a person with a good education, which makes it easier to participate in social activities.
 If you show a bit of basic courtesy, the Parisian rudeness disappears very quickly.
 Plitvice Lakes National Park is a forest of mainly beech, fir and spruce, with a mixture of Mediterranean and Alpine vegetation.
 Because of the small climate, soil, and altitude, the plant life here is very diverse and famous.
 The area is also home to a variety of animals and birds.
 There, you can see rare animals like the European Brown bear, wolves, Eagles, Owls, Lynx, Bobcats, and Squirrels, as well as many more common species.
 Women must wear skirts when visiting the monastery, and the skirts must be at least knee-length, with the shoulders also covered.
 Most monasteries will provide a wrap for women who are not prepared, but if you bring your own, especially if it's a bright color, the monks at the door will throw you a wink.
 As a result, men must wear long pants to cover their knees.
 You can also borrow from the coat rack at the entrance, but the clothes are not washed every time someone wears them, so these dresses may feel a little uncomfortable.
 Malaga's cuisine and that of the Mediterranean region are based mainly on bread, vegetables and meat, especially pork, and are completely olive oil based.
 Pa amb Oli is a simple, summer-only meal that consists of bread, olive oil, tomato, and any toppings you have on hand, like cheese, goldfish, or even avocado.
 Except for Sie, all nouns should begin with a capital letter, even in the middle of a sentence.
 This is a key way to distinguish some verbs and their objects.
 This also makes reading easier, although it makes writing more complicated, since you need to judge whether a verb or adjective is being used as a noun.
 Italian is relatively easy to pronounce because most words are spelled and pronounced exactly the same.
 The main letters to pay attention to are c and g, because their pronunciation changes depending on the vowel.
 We call this process speciation, which just means the formation of new species.
 Persian grammar is relatively simple and regular.
 So reading this grammar book can help you to master more Persian grammar and to better understand short phrases.
 Without a doubt, learning Portuguese will be easier if you know one of the Romance languages.
 However, a person who knows a little Spanish may be tempted to conclude that Portuguese and Spanish are very similar, and that it's unnecessary to learn Portuguese.
 Today, most of the pre-modern observatories have been decommissioned, and only serve as museums or educational facilities.
 Because in its heyday, light pollution was not as bad as it is now, so Observatories were often built in or near cities,
 Most modern research telescopes are huge facilities located in remote areas with good atmospheric conditions.
 Hanami, or the viewing of cherry blossoms, began in the eighth century.
 This concept comes from China, where the peony is a favorite flower.
 In Japan, the earliest Cherry Blossom parties were held by the Emperor for himself and other members of the Royal family at the Imperial Palace.
 Plants are at their best in a natural environment, so resist the temptation to pick a plant, even if it's just one.
 If you visit a carefully manicured garden, collecting specimens can also get you ejected, without much room for negotiation.
 Singapore is generally a very safe place, navigation is easy, and once you arrive, you can buy almost anything.
 But because it's in the high-tropics, you'll need to deal with both high temperatures and strong sunlight.
 A few buses also headed north to Hebron, the traditional burial site of Abraham, Isaac, Jacob, and their wives.
 Please confirm that you intend to board the bus to Hebron, and not just to the nearby Kiryat Arba Jewish settlement.
 Inland waterways can make for a nice theme for a vacation.
 For example, visit a castle in the Loire Valley and the Rhine Valley, or take a cruise on the Danube River to see the good cities along its banks.
 They also clearly marked routes for popular hiking and biking routes.
 Christmas is one of the most important holidays in the Christian religion, and is celebrated to commemorate the birth of Jesus Christ.
 Many traditions associated with this holiday are also embraced by non-Christian and non-Western nations around the world.
 One tradition is to wake up at dawn on Easter Sunday and watch the sunrise.
 Of course, this tradition has its Christian theological explanation, but it probably existed long before the birth of Christ.
 More traditional churches often hold Easter Vigils on Saturday night, when the congregation usually floods in at the stroke of midnight to celebrate Christ's resurrection.
 Initially, animals arrived on these Islands by swimming, flying, or by floating.
 Because of their remote location, mammals were unable to come over long distances, and the giant turtles became the main herbivores of the Cocos Islands.
 Humans introduced many mammals to the Galapagos Islands, including sheep, goats, cows, rats, cats, and dogs.
 If you go to the Arctic or Antarctic region in winter, you can experience the polar night, when the sun doesn't rise for a period of time.
 This provides a great opportunity to see the Aurora because the sky will be dark for a whole day or more.
 These areas are sparsely populated, and generally do not have light pollution, so you can also enjoy a beautiful night sky.
 Compared to the Western work culture, the Japanese work culture is more formal and more obvious in the hierarchy system.
 Western suits are standard business attire, and colleagues use each other's surnames or job titles to refer to each other.
 A harmonious workplace atmosphere is crucial, emphasizing teamwork, rather than praising individual achievements.
 The employees must get approval from their superiors before making any decisions and must unconditionally obey their instructions.
Results bleu: {'bleu': 0.20547878349042736, 'precisions': [0.5518104015799868, 0.2792908648325908, 0.16314243051876115, 0.09959997974580992], 'brevity_penalty': 0.9185415111734933, 'length_ratio': 0.9216860159378666, 'translation_length': 22785, 'reference_length': 24721} results chrF: {'score': 48.17783662977554, 'char_order': 6, 'word_order': 0, 'beta': 2}